Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.135

Solid waste or recyclable materials collection—Curbside recycling—Reduced rate.

(1) Each city or town providing by ordinance or resolution a reduced solid waste collection rate to residents participating in a residential curbside recycling program implemented under RCW 70A.205.045, may provide a similar reduced rate to residents participating in any other recycling program, if such program is approved by the jurisdiction. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to reduce the authority of a city to adopt ordinances under RCW 35.21.130(1).

(2) For the purposes of this section, "reduced rate" means a residential solid waste collection rate incorporating a rebate, refund, or discount. Reduced rate shall not include residential solid waste collection rate based on the volume or weight of solid waste set out for collection.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1006; 1991 c 319 s 404.]